dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX VC Y      16
SFX VC i      a          i
SFX VC i      e          i
SFX VC i      ima        i
SFX VC o      e          o
SFX VC o      u          o
SFX VC o      om         o
SFX VC 0      ta         e
SFX VC 0      tu         e
SFX VC 0      tom        e
SFX VC 0      tima       e
SFX VC 0      a          s
SFX VC 0      u          s
SFX VC 0      om         s
SFX VC 0      ove        s
SFX VC 0      ovi        s
SFX VC 0      ovima      s

SFX VB Y      16
SFX VB 0      a          k
SFX VB 0      u          k
SFX VB 0      om         k
SFX VB 0      i          k
SFX VB 0      e          k
SFX VB 0      ima        k
SFX VB 0      i          č
SFX VB 0      ju         č
SFX VB 0      ima        č
SFX VB o      a          o
SFX VB o      u          o
SFX VB o      om         o
SFX VB o      i          o
SFX VB o      e          o
SFX VB o      ima        o
SFX VB a      ima        a

SFX VA Y      31
SFX VA anj    nja        anj
SFX VA anj    nju        anj
SFX VA anj    njem       anj
SFX VA anj    njevi      anj
SFX VA anj    njeva      anj
SFX VA anj    njevima    anj
SFX VA anj    njeve      anj
SFX VA al     la         al
SFX VA al     lu         al
SFX VA al     lem        al
SFX VA al     levi       al
SFX VA al     leva       al
SFX VA al     levima     al
SFX VA al     leve       al
SFX VA ijeme  emena      ijeme
SFX VA ijeme  emenu      ijeme
SFX VA ijeme  emenom     ijeme
SFX VA ijeme  emenima    ijeme
SFX VA ijebe  ebeta      ijebe
SFX VA ijebe  ebetu      ijebe
SFX VA ijebe  ebetom     ijebe
SFX VA ijebe  ebad       ijebe
SFX VA ijebe  ebadi      ijebe
SFX VA am     ma         am
SFX VA am     mu         am
SFX VA am     me         am
SFX VA am     mom        am
SFX VA am     movi       am
SFX VA am     mova       am
SFX VA am     movima     am
SFX VA am     move       am

SFX UZ Y      12
SFX UZ o      e          o
SFX UZ o      u          o
SFX UZ o      i          o
SFX UZ o      om         o
SFX UZ 0      a          c
SFX UZ 0      u          c
SFX UZ 0      em         c
SFX UZ c      če         c
SFX UZ c      čevi       c
SFX UZ c      čeva       c
SFX UZ c      čevima     c
SFX UZ c      čeve       c

SFX UY Y      12
SFX UY ao     lovi       ao
SFX UY ao     lova       ao
SFX UY ao     lovima     ao
SFX UY ao     love       ao
SFX UY at     tovi       at
SFX UY at     tova       at
SFX UY at     tovima     at
SFX UY at     tove       at
SFX UY alj    ljevi      alj
SFX UY alj    ljeva      alj
SFX UY alj    ljevima    alj
SFX UY alj    ljeve      alj

SFX UX Y      7
SFX UX 0      a          .
SFX UX 0      u          .
SFX UX 0      om         .
SFX UX 0      evi        .
SFX UX 0      eva        .
SFX UX 0      evima      .
SFX UX 0      eve        .

SFX UW Y      7
SFX UW 0      a          . 
SFX UW 0      u          .
SFX UW 0      e          .
SFX UW 0      em         .
SFX UW 0      i          .
SFX UW 0      ima        .
SFX UW c      če         c

SFX UV Y      5
SFX UV n      nje        n
SFX UV n      nja        n
SFX UV n      nju        n
SFX UV n      njem       n
SFX UV n      njima      n

SFX UU Y      14
SFX UU e      a          e
SFX UU e      u          e
SFX UU e      em         e
SFX UU e      ima        e
SFX UU o      a          o
SFX UU o      u          o
SFX UU o      om         o
SFX UU o      ima        o
SFX UU kno    kana       kno
SFX UU tvo    tava       tvo
SFX UU dro    dara       dro
SFX UU dlo    dala       dlo
SFX UU vce    vaca       vce
SFX UU šce    šaca       šce

SFX UT Y      4
SFX UT 0      na         e
SFX UT 0      nu         e
SFX UT 0      nom        e
SFX UT 0      nima       e

SFX US Y      4
SFX US 0      ta         e
SFX US 0      tu         e
SFX US 0      tom        e
SFX US 0      tima       e

SFX UR Y      5
SFX UR ti     nje        ti
SFX UR ti     nja        ti
SFX UR ti     nju        ti
SFX UR ti     njem       ti
SFX UR ti     njima      ti

SFX UQ Y      47
SFX UQ 0      a          . 
SFX UQ 0      u          .
SFX UQ 0      e          .
SFX UQ 0      om         .
SFX UQ g      že         g
SFX UQ g      zi         g
SFX UQ g      zima       g
SFX UQ 0      ov         .
SFX UQ 0      ova        .
SFX UQ 0      ovu        .
SFX UQ 0      ovim       .
SFX UQ 0      ovi        .
SFX UQ 0      ovih       .
SFX UQ 0      ovima      .
SFX UQ 0      ove        .
SFX UQ 0      ovo        .
SFX UQ 0      ovoj       .
SFX UQ 0      ovom       .
SFX UQ 0      ovog       .
SFX UQ 0      ovoga      .
SFX UQ 0      ovome      .
SFX UQ 0      ovomu      .
SFX UQ 0      inja       .
SFX UQ 0      inje       .
SFX UQ 0      inji       .
SFX UQ 0      inju       .
SFX UQ 0      injo       .
SFX UQ 0      injom      .
SFX UQ 0      injama     .
SFX UQ 0      injin      .
SFX UQ 0      injina     .
SFX UQ 0      injinu     .
SFX UQ 0      injini     .
SFX UQ 0      injinim    .
SFX UQ 0      injinih    .
SFX UQ 0      injinima   .
SFX UQ 0      injine     .
SFX UQ 0      injino     .
SFX UQ 0      injinoj    .
SFX UQ 0      injinom    .
SFX UQ 0      ija        .
SFX UQ 0      ije        .
SFX UQ 0      iji        .
SFX UQ 0      iju        .
SFX UQ 0      ijo        .
SFX UQ 0      ijom       .
SFX UQ 0      ijama      .

SFX UP Y      18
SFX UP 0      a          .
SFX UP 0      u          .
SFX UP 0      i          .
SFX UP 0      im         .
SFX UP 0      ih         .
SFX UP 0      ima        .
SFX UP 0      e          .
SFX UP 0      o          .
SFX UP 0      oj         .
SFX UP 0      om         .
SFX UP 0      og         .
SFX UP 0      oga        .
SFX UP 0      ome        .
SFX UP 0      omu        .
SFX UP 0      ost        .
SFX UP 0      osti       .
SFX UP 0      ostima     .
SFX UP 0      ošću       .

SFX UO Y      17
SFX UO i      a          i
SFX UO i      u          i
SFX UO i      im         i
SFX UO i      ih         i
SFX UO i      ima        i
SFX UO i      e          i
SFX UO i      o          i
SFX UO i      oj         i
SFX UO i      om         i
SFX UO i      og         i
SFX UO i      oga        i
SFX UO i      ome        i
SFX UO i      omu        i
SFX UO i      ost        i
SFX UO i      osti       i
SFX UO i      ostima     i
SFX UO i      ošću       i

SFX UN Y      18
SFX UN 0      a          .
SFX UN 0      u          .
SFX UN 0      i          .
SFX UN 0      im         .
SFX UN 0      ih         .
SFX UN 0      ima        .
SFX UN 0      e          .
SFX UN 0      o          .
SFX UN 0      oj         .
SFX UN 0      om         .
SFX UN 0      og         [^čćšjžđ]
SFX UN 0      oga        [^čćšjžđ]
SFX UN 0      ome        [^čćšjžđ]
SFX UN 0      omu        [^čćšjžđ]
SFX UN 0      eg         [čćšjžđ]
SFX UN 0      ega        [čćšjžđ]
SFX UN 0      em         [čćšjžđ]
SFX UN 0      emu        [čćšjžđ]

SFX UM Y      17
SFX UM i      a          i
SFX UM i      u          i
SFX UM i      im         i
SFX UM i      ih         i
SFX UM i      ima        i
SFX UM i      e          i
SFX UM i      o          i
SFX UM i      oj         i
SFX UM i      om         i
SFX UM i      og         [^čćšjžđ]i
SFX UM i      oga        [^čćšjžđ]i
SFX UM i      ome        [^čćšjžđ]i
SFX UM i      omu        [^čćšjžđ]i
SFX UM i      eg         [čćšjžđ]i
SFX UM i      ega        [čćšjžđ]i
SFX UM i      em         [čćšjžđ]i
SFX UM i      emu        [čćšjžđ]i

SFX UL Y      14
SFX UL tan    ni         tan
SFX UL tan    nog        tan
SFX UL tan    noga       tan
SFX UL tan    nom        tan
SFX UL tan    nome       tan
SFX UL tan    nomu       tan
SFX UL tan    nih        tan
SFX UL tan    nim        tan
SFX UL tan    nima       tan
SFX UL tan    ne         tan
SFX UL tan    no         tan
SFX UL tan    na         tan
SFX UL tan    noj        tan
SFX UL tan    nu         tan

AF XZURUD	# 33
AF XZURUC	# 34
AF XYUR	# 44
AF XYURUC	# 47
AF WZUO	# 116
AF WWUM	# 140
AF VOVB	# 213
AF VMVA	# 250
AF VMVAUA	# 251
AF VMUY	# 252
AF VMUYUA	# 253
AF VEUS	# 300
AF VDVC	# 305
AF VDUY	# 306
AF VDUS	# 307
AF VC	# 309
AF VB	# 312
AF VBUJ	# 313
AF VBUF	# 314
AF VBTT	# 316
AF VA	# 317
AF UZ	# 319
AF UZUI	# 320
AF UX	# 321
AF UXUN	# 322
AF UXUJ	# 323
AF UW	# 324
AF UU	# 331
AF UUVCUS	# 333
AF UUUS	# 334
AF UT	# 337
AF UQUA	# 339
AF UP	# 340
AF UPUV	# 341
AF UOUE	# 347
AF UN	# 348
AF UNUV	# 349
AF UM	# 353
AF UMUB	# 355
AF UL	# 357
