dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.dic
astrolog/339
Baleari/309
bezuspješni/347
blatnjaviji/355
blento/319
brajko/319
breme/337
brico/319
brojenje/331
ciljati/33
cipli/309
češalj/252
češanj/250
četverouglast/348
četvoro/312
čir/321
čistac/324
dečko/314
demagog/339
djetence/300
dojam/317
dokumentaristički/353
domotužje/331
dopuštati/34
dugme/305
dugmence/334
Đuro/309
egzaktni/347
etimolog/339
fiks/321
filek/213
fleš/321
geomorfolog/339
gležanj/250
glup/340
gnjiliji/355
govoren/349
grudav/348
grupirati/33
hadž/321
Havaji/309
hodočašćenje/331
iks/321
ime/337
impresario/314
interventni/347
izdvajati/34
izobličen/341
izostali/353
izrođen/341
jajašce/334
jarostan/357
jezerce/333
jež/323
kabao/306
kapric/324
kardiokirurg/339
Karibi/309
klizište/331
kolica/312
konjic/324
kotao/306
kovitlac/324
kožnat/348
kredenc/324
kresovi/309
kriogeni/353
ksenofobični/347
lakat/252
maslac/324
mastan/357
Mato/320
meč/321
medo/319
međuvrijeme/317
meteorolog/339
mikado/312
mjerodavniji/355
mjestance/334
množen/349
mrazovit/340
mudrac/324
nabijati/34
naprjeđenje/331
natapirati/116
natmuren/341
nedijagnosticiran/341
neposvećen/340
neprobojni/347
nepronađen/348
nesavjestan/357
neuropsiholog/339
njedra/316
obavješten/349
oboriv/340
odlučniji/355
odljućen/349
oganj/250
ogledalce/334
opalescentni/347
opsjenjivati/47
orao/306
otkočen/341
paklovi/309
pakostan/357
parazitolog/339
pianino/331
pijetao/306
pobijeljen/348
pojam/317
pojas/321
pončo/312
ponjemčen/341
posao/306
posvojen/349
požućivati/44
prastric/319
prašinast/348
prečac/324
predklasični/347
preksinoćnji/353
prezime/337
princ/319
prituženje/331
propustan/357
puce/307
pust/322
raskrčen/341
raspetljavati/34
raspiren/341
ražanj/250
relativni/347
robustan/357
samosvjestan/357
sedlo/331
semiolog/339
seoce/334
sivomrk/348
skinuti/140
slastan/357
sleđ/321
smisao/306
stakalce/334
Stipo/309
strastan/357
stric/319
striček/313
stupanj/250
sudarati/34
svesmjerni/347
svjetlac/324
svojevrstan/357
škopljen/341
šmrkav/340
štagalj/253
tajac/324
tipkalo/331
tipolog/339
toranj/251
unošen/349
uprosječen/341
uralski/353
ustašca/312
uvažati/34
uzao/306
vratašca/316
vretence/334
vrijeme/317
zaliječen/340
zapremljen/341
zidarstvo/331
žljebovi/309
